Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.67.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that the provision of customized training is critical to attracting and retaining businesses, and that the growth of many businesses is limited by an unmet need for customized training. The legislature also finds that workforce training not only helps business, it also improves the quality of life for workers and communities. Because of the statewide public benefit to be gained from instituting a customized training program, the legislature intends to create a new program to fund workforce training in a manner that reduces the up-front costs of training to new and expanding firms.

[ 2006 c 112 s 1.]